Wyoming, session 2025, HB0204.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-2-201(d)(ii), (vi) and (ix) is
amended to read:

23-2-201. Fees; restrictions; verification of
residency required.

(d) The following fishing licenses may be purchased
for the fee indicated in addition to the applicable fee
HB0204

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0591
under W.S. 23-1-701 and subject to the limitations
provided:

(ii) Nonresident fishing license.........$100.00
$110.00

(vi) Nonresident daily fishing license....$12.00
$14.00

(ix) Nonresident five (5) consecutive day
fishing license......................................$54.00
$60.00

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0204